Maryland, session 2026, SB0387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–321.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3.5–801 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) “CONSENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “DYNAMIC PRICING” MEANS THE PRACTICE OF VARYING
THE PRICES OF CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES WITHIN A BUSINESS DAY BASED ON
DEMAND OR OTHER FACTORS, INCLUDING THROUGH THE USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE OR MODELS THAT RETRAIN OR RECALIBRATE BASED ON RECEIVED
INFORMATION IN NEAR REAL–TIME DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICE OF OFFERING OR
SETTING A PERSONALIZED PRICE FOR A GOOD OR SERVICE THAT IS SPECIFIC TO A

SENATE BILL 387 3
CONSUMER BASED ON THE CONSUMER’S PERSONAL DATA, REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE SELLER COLLECTED OR PURCHASED THE PERSONAL DATA.
(II) “DYNAMIC PRICING” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE:
1. THE USE OF PROMOTIONAL PRICING OFFERS,
LOYALTY PROGRAM BENEFITS, OR OTHER TEMPORARY DISCOUNTS OR CHANGES TO
PRICING RELATED TO RETENTION OF EXISTING CUSTOMERS;
2. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON OBJECTIVE COSTS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO PROVIDING CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES TO DIFFERENT
CONSUMERS, SUCH AS A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE CAUSED BY SHIPPING COSTS OR
TAXES BASED ON A CONSUMER’S PHYSICAL LOCATION;
3. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON COSTS OR
DIFFERENCES IN SUPPLY OR DEMAND ASSOCIATED WITH PROVIDING OR SELLING A
GOOD OR SERVICE IN DIFFERENT LOCATIONS OR GEOGRAPHIES;
4. A DIFFERENCE IN PRICE BASED ON COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH THE AVAILABILITY OR SUPPLY OF THE GOOD OR SERVICE;
5. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER THROUGH A
LOYALTY, MEMBERSHIP, OR REWARDS PROGRAM IN WHICH ANY CONSUMER MAY
VOLUNTARILY ENROLL OR CONSENT TO PARTICIPATE;
6. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER IN CONNECTION
WITH A SUBSCRIPTION–BASED CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT;
7. A PRICE OFFERED TO A CONSUMER WHO CONSENTS
TO PROVIDING PERSONAL DATA OR OTHER INFORMATION IN EXCHANGE FOR
OBTAINING THE PRICE;
8. A PRICE CORRECTION RESULTING FROM A PRICING
ERROR; OR
9. RESETTING A PRICE FOLLOWING A SYSTEM OR
NETWORK OUTAGE.
(4) “FOOD RETAILER” MEANS A MERCHANT THAT OPERATES A
BUSINESS ESTABLISHMENT THAT:
(I) HAS A MINIMUM OF 15,000 SQUARE FEET; AND

SENATE BILL 387
(II) SELLS FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE
TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(5) “SURVEILLANCE DATA” MEANS CONSUMER INFORMATION
COLLECTED AND TRACKED BY TECHNOLOGICAL METHODS, SYSTEMS, OR TOOLS,
SUCH AS SENSORS, CAMERAS, DEVICE TRACKING, BIOMETRIC MONITORING, OR
OTHER FORMS OF OBSERVATION OR DATA COLLECTION, THAT ARE CAPABLE OF
GATHERING PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION ABOUT A CONSUMER’S
BEHAVIOR, CHARACTERISTICS, LOCATION, OR OTHER PERSONAL ATTRIBUTES,
WHETHER IN A PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL ENVIRONMENT.
(5) “PERSONAL DATA” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–4701 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(6) (I) “THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE PROVIDER”
MEANS A MERCHANT THAT PROVIDES AS A CONSUMER SERVICE THE DELIVERY OF
FOOD THAT IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE TAX IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
11–206(C) OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) “THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE PROVIDER” DOES
NOT INCLUDE A FOOD RETAILER.
(B) A FOOD RETAILER OR THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY NOT ENGAGE:
(1) ENGAGE IN DYNAMIC PRICING TO INCREASE A PRICE FOR
CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES FOR A SPECIFIC CONSUMER; OR USE
(2) USE SURVEILLANCE PERSONAL DATA TO SET INCREASE A PRICE
FOR CONSUMER GOODS OR SERVICES FOR A SINGLE CONSUMER OR A GROUP OF
CONSUMERS.
(C) A FOOD RETAILER OR THIRD–PARTY FOOD DELIVERY SERVICE
PROVIDER MAY NOT USE PROTECTED CLASS DATA TO OFFER, ADVERTISE, OR SELL
A CONSUMER GOOD OR SERVICE TO A CONSUMER FOR WHOM THE PROTECTED CLASS
DATA PERTAINS IF THE USE OF THE PROTECTED CLASS DATA HAS THE EFFECT OF
WITHHOLDING OR DENYING FROM THE CONSUMER AN ACCOMMODATION, AN
ADVANTAGE, OR A PRIVILEGE ACCORDED TO OTHERS.
(D) (1) BEFORE INITIATING AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER SUBTITLE
4 OF THIS TITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION SHALL ISSUE A
NOTICE OF VIOLATION TO THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR.

SENATE BILL 387 5
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL PROVIDE THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR 45 DAYS
AFTER THE NOTICE OF VIOLATION IS RECEIVED TO CURE THE VIOLATION.
(3) IF THE ALLEGED VIOLATOR CURES THE VIOLATION WITHIN THE
TIME PERIOD SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
DIVISION MAY NOT INITIATE AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION.
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO AUTHORIZE A PRIVATE
RIGHT OF ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION OR ANY OTHER LAW.
13–408.
(a) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A VIOLATION OF § 13–321 OF THIS
TITLE.
(B) In addition to any action by the Division or Attorney General authorized by
this title and any other action otherwise authorized by law, any person may bring an action
to recover for injury or loss sustained by him as the result of a practice prohibited by this
title.
[(b)] (C) Any person who brings an action to recover for injury or loss under this
section and who is awarded damages may also seek, and the court may award, reasonable
attorney’s fees.
[(c)] (D) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court, at any time, that an action
is brought in bad faith or is of a frivolous nature, the court may order the offending party
to pay to the other party reasonable attorney’s fees.
[(d)] (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person may not
bring an action under this section to recover for injuries sustained as a result of the
professional services provided by a health care provider, as defined in § 3–2A–01 of the
Courts Article.
13–411.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A VIOLATION OF § 13–321 OF THIS
TITLE.
[(a)] (B) Except as provided in subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, any person
who violates any provision of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and, unless another
criminal penalty is specifically provided elsewhere, on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding $1,000 or imprisonment not exceeding one year or both, in addition to any civil
penalties.

SENATE BILL 387
[(b)] (C) A person may not be imprisoned for violation of any provision of an
order of the Attorney General or an agreement of a party relating to unit pricing under
Title 14, Subtitle 1 of this article.
14–4701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(w) (1) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or can be
reasonably linked to an identified or identifiable consumer.
(2) “Personal data” does not include:
(i) De–identified data; or
(ii) Publicly available information.
Article – Labor and Employment
4–406.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FOOD RETAILER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
13–321 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) A FOOD RETAILER MAY NOT IMPLEMENT AN ADMINISTRATIVE,
OPERATIONAL, OR ORGANIZATIONAL CHANGE THAT DIMINISHES OR IMPAIRS ANY
RIGHT OR BENEFIT GUARANTEED TO EMPLOYEES OF THE FOOD RETAILER UNDER
AN EXISTING COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING UNLESS THE CHANGE IS NEGOTIATED AND MUTUALLY AGREED ON
WITH THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE EMPLOYEES.
(C) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION TO RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS
SUSTAINED AS A RESULT OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(D) A PERSON WHO BRINGS AN ACTION TO RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS
UNDER THIS SECTION AND WHO IS AWARDED DAMAGES MAY ALSO SEEK, AND THE
COURT MAY AWARD, REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(E) IF IT APPEARS TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE COURT, AT ANY TIME,
THAT AN ACTION IS BROUGHT IN BAD FAITH OR IS OF A FRIVOLOUS NATURE, THE
COURT MAY ORDER THE OFFENDING PARTY TO PAY TO THE OTHER PARTY
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
Article – Tax – General

SENATE BILL 387 7
11–206.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the sales and
use tax does not apply to a sale of food for consumption off the premises by a food vendor
who operates a substantial grocery or market business at the same location where the food
is sold.
(2) The exemption under paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) food that the vendor serves for consumption on the premises of
the buyer or of a third party; or
(ii) food for immediate consumption.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.